not-to-release/fst/preterite.xfst
[
  [ [ a | i ] -> 0 || _ %{del%} ] .o.
  [ y -> x || _ %{del%} ] .o.
  [ [ q u ] -> c || _ %{del%} ] .o.
  [ [ h u ] -> [ u h ] || _ %{del%} ] .o.
  [ %{del%} -> 0 ] .o.
  [ [ c a ] (->) [ q u i ] || _ %{caus%} ] .o.
  [ a (->) [ 0 | i ] || _ %{caus%} ] .o.
  [ l (->) 0 || %{caus%} _ t ] .o.
  [ %{caus%} -> 0 ] .o.
  [ %{%~n%} -> [ n | 0 ] ] .o.
  [ [ u c ] -> [ c u ] || _ ( %> ) i ]
]
